Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
PART 2 Claims Against State or Departments or Agencies

Administrative rules and regulations.

Claims of over $5,000, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Claims Advisory Board, Chapter 115-2.

Claims of $5,000 or less, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Claims Advisory Board, Chapter 115-3.

28-5-80.
Introduction of compensation resolutions; general requirements as to filing of notice of claim.

Any resolution relative to a claim against the state or any of its departments or agencies must be introduced in the House of Representatives. No such resolution may be introduced unless a notice of claim has been filed with the board on or before the fifteenth day of November immediately preceding the introduction of the resolution, if the event giving rise to a claim against the state occurred on or before the fifth day of November. If said event occurred subsequent to the fifth day of November, immediately preceding the introduction of the resolution a notice of claim shall be filed as provided for in this Code section within ten days after the occurrence of the event giving rise to the claim. No such resolution shall be introduced after the tenth day of any regular session.

The board shall provide forms to be used in filing a notice of claim and shall make them available for such purpose. When the notice is filed, the board shall inform the person filing the notice, in writing, of the information it will require in order to take action on the claim. Such information may include accident reports, affidavits, statements, bills, receipts, letters, documents, and any other supporting material or data deemed necessary by the board. All such information must be filed with the board prior to the introduction of the resolution.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 624, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 653, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 395, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 28; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1243, § 1.

Cross references.

Manner of enactment of laws by General Assembly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. V.

Insuring and indemnification of public officers and employees generally, § 45-9-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For note, “An Alternative to the Georgia Claims Advisory Board: State Tort Liability,” see 2 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (1968).

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).

For article, “Tort Claims Against the State: Georgia’s Compensation System,” see 32 Ga. L. Rev. 1103 (1998).

28-5-81.
Notice of possibility of claims to be filed by state departments and agencies; effect of filing of notice and of failure to file notice.

It shall be the duty of each state department and agency to file with the Claims Advisory Board a notice of possibility of claim covering any occurrence which would be the subject of a notice of claim as provided in Code Section 28-5-80. Such notice of possibility of claim shall be filed on forms provided by the Claims Advisory Board and furnished to each state department and agency upon request. It shall be the duty of each state department and agency to file a notice of possibility of claim within 30 days after the date of any such occurrence. If filed within the same time limitations provided relative to the filing of notices of claim as provided in Code Section 28-5-80, a notice of possibility of claim shall be sufficient for action to be taken thereon; and the fact that no notice of claim has been filed within the time provided shall not prevent the introduction of a resolution and action thereon as provided in this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 824, § 1.

Cross references.

Insuring and indemnification of public officers and employees generally, § 45-9-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).

28-5-82.
Board hearings.

Any resolution authorized by Code Section 28-5-80 shall be referred by the Speaker of the House to the Appropriations Committee of the House; and the Clerk of the House shall transmit a certified copy of the resolution to the chairman of the Claims Advisory Board not later than the day after its referral to the appropriations committee. Upon receipt of such copy, the chairman, after consultation with the other members of the board, shall set a time for acting on the claim and shall set a date for a hearing if a hearing is deemed necessary. In the event a hearing is to be held, the Representative introducing the bill shall be notified of the date, time, and place thereof. Such other persons as the board deems necessary shall likewise be notified. The Representative introducing the resolution shall be notified as to the action taken by the board on the claim and the recommendation made by the board to the appropriations committee. In the event the Representative is dissatisfied with the recommendation of the board and no hearing has been held, he shall be entitled to have the board set a hearing by so requesting the chairman in writing.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 624, § 3.

Cross references.

Insuring and indemnification of public officers and employees generally, § 45-9-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For note, “An Alternative to the Georgia Claims Advisory Board: State Tort Liability,” see 2 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (1968).

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).

28-5-83.
Investigation of claims by board; advisory recommendations.

Upon receipt of a notice of claim, the board may begin its investigation thereof; or it may wait until the supporting information provided for in Code Section 28-5-80 has been furnished. After investigation of the claim by the board, after introduction of the resolution, and after a hearing thereon, if any, the board shall prepare a statement including its findings, its determination of the merits of the claim, its recommendation as to the payment thereof, and such other information as the board deems advisable. Such statement shall be immediately transmitted to the chairman of the House Appropriations Committee, who shall present the same to the full committee. The recommendations of the board shall be advisory in nature only and shall not be binding on the House of Representatives, the Senate, or any committee of either. The resolution shall be acted upon in the same manner as provided by law and the rules of the House and Senate for action upon bills.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 624, § 4.

Cross references.

Insuring and indemnification of public officers and employees generally, § 45-9-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For note, “An Alternative to the Georgia Claims Advisory Board: State Tort Liability,” see 2 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (1968).

For note discussing some limitations on governmental tort immunity, see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 494 (1969).

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).

28-5-84.
Restrictions on passage of resolutions and board powers.

No resolution provided for in this part shall be passed without being presented to the board. The board is prohibited from considering any resolution unless notice of claim is filed within the time provided for in Code Section 28-5-80, unless the resolution is introduced within the time limitations specified in Code Section 28-5-80, and unless the information required by the board is filed within the time limitations specified in Code Section 28-5-80. The board shall make no recommendations after the fifteenth day of any regular session.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 624, § 5; Ga. L. 1965, p. 653, § 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 395, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1243, § 2.

Cross references.

Insuring and indemnification of public officers and employees generally, § 45-9-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For note, “An Alternative to the Georgia Claims Advisory Board: State Tort Liability,” see 2 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (1968).

For note discussing some limitations on governmental tort immunity, see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 494 (1969).

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).

28-5-85.
Payment of small claims by board.

When the total amount of a claim against the state is $5,000.00 or less, and the claim is not of a type excluded from a recommendation for compensation by subsection (a) of Code Section 28-5-104, the Claims Advisory Board shall be authorized to direct the state department or agency affected by the claim to pay the claimant such amount, not exceeding $5,000.00, as may be authorized by the Claims Advisory Board pursuant to the authority of this Code section.

If a citizen has a claim against the state subject to the provisions of this Code section, such person may file such claim with the Claims Advisory Board. The Claims Advisory Board shall promulgate rules or regulations governing the submission of claims pursuant to this Code section. Such rules or regulations shall be adopted under the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, known as the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

When a claim subject to this Code section is filed with the Claims Advisory Board, said board shall notify the department or agency of the state government affected by such claim of the basis for such claim, and such notice shall include any information submitted by the claimant in support of such claim. Within 45 days after receiving such notification, it shall be the duty of such state department or agency to submit a report to the Claims Advisory Board setting forth the findings of such state department or agency relative to such claim. Said report may make a recommendation to the Claims Advisory Board relative to the payment of such claim, but such recommendation shall not be binding upon the Claims Advisory Board.

After reviewing and considering all information submitted by a claimant in support of the claim against the state and the report of the state department or agency affected by such claim, the Claims Advisory Board shall make a determination either to pay or reject such claim against the state. The Claims Advisory Board shall not be bound by the total amount claimed against the state and may authorize the payment of a lesser amount. If the Claims Advisory Board determines that the claim against the state is justified and that the amount of such claim, or a portion thereof, should be paid, it shall issue its order to the chief executive or administrative officer of the state department or agency affected by such claim ordering such officer, within 30 days after receipt of such order, to pay the claimant the amount specified by the Claims Advisory Board in its order. A copy of such order shall be mailed to the claimant. If the Claims Advisory Board determines that the claim against the state should be rejected, it shall notify the claimant of such rejection, and such notice shall explain the reasons for such rejection. A copy of such notice to the claimant shall be sent to the state department or agency affected by the claim. The decision of the Claims Advisory Board shall be final.

The Claims Advisory Board shall not authorize or direct the payment of any part of any claim under this Code section which is paid or payable by insurance.

Any payment made to a claimant pursuant to the authority of this Code section shall be in full and complete settlement of any claim against the state arising from the same occurrence, and each claimant, as a condition precedent to receiving payment pursuant to this Code section, shall acknowledge and agree to the requirements of this subsection pursuant to regulations adopted by the Claims Advisory Board for such purpose.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply to any claim against the state in the amount of $5,000.00 or less if the date of the occurrence giving rise to such claim was after July 1, 2000. After July 1, 2000, the General Assembly shall not consider any compensation resolution for a claim against the state if the amount of the claim is $5,000.00 or less, and the provisions of this Code section shall be the exclusive method for making such claims against the state, except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection.

If the claim against the state is timely filed with the Claims Advisory Board after July 1, 2000, for an occurrence which took place before July 1, 2000, and the amount of the claim is less than $5,000.00 but more than $500.00, the claimant shall have the option of seeking a compensation resolution from the General Assembly. All claims pending on July 1, 2000, or thereafter if such claim is based on an occurrence which took place before July 1, 2000, for $500.00 or less shall be settled exclusively through the Claims Advisory Board.

The General Assembly waives the immunity of the state for the purpose of authorizing the payment of claims against the state pursuant to the authority of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 930, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 608, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 28; Ga. L. 1999, p. 798, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1243, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1243, § 3, amended this Code section and in so doing omitted without expressly repealing language added to subsection (a) of this Code section by Ga. L. 1999, p. 798, § 1.
The two amendments were not irreconcilably conflicting and, in accordance with Reeves v. Gay,

92 Ga. 309

(1893), the amendment to this Code section made by Ga. L. 1999, p. 798, § 1, was treated as not having been repealed by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1243, § 3.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, in paragraph (g)(2), “July 1, 2000,” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section”.

28-5-86.
Time for filing notice of claim.

No claim or resolution for the payment of compensation under this part shall be considered by the board or the General Assembly unless notice of claim has been filed with the board within two years after the date of the event giving rise to the claim.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-86

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 608, § 2.

Law reviews.

For survey article on contracts — legislation, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 71 (1982).